Utah statutes.
16-10a-1506.   Corporate name and assumed corporate name of foreign
corporation.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), if the corporate name of a foreign
corporation does not satisfy the requirements of Section 16-10a-401, which
applies to domestic corporations, the foreign corporation, in order to obtain
authority to transact business in this state, shall assume for use in this
state a name that satisfies the requirements of Section 16-10a-401.
(2)  A foreign corporation may obtain authority to transact business in this
state with a name that does not meet the requirements of Subsection (1)
because it is not distinguishable as required under Subsection 16-10a-401(2),
if the foreign corporation delivers to the division for filing either:
(a)  a written consent to the foreign corporation's use of the name, given and
signed by the other person entitled to the use of the name together with a
written undertaking by the other person, in a form satisfactory to the
division, to change its name to a name that is distinguishable from the name
of the applicant; or
(b)  a certified copy of a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction
establishing the prior right of the foreign corporation to use the requested
name in this state.
(3)  A foreign corporation may use in this state the name, including the
fictitious name, of another domestic or foreign corporation that is used or
registered in this state if the other corporation is incorporated or
authorized to transact business in this state and the foreign corporation:
(a)  has merged with the other corporation; or
(b)  has been formed by reorganization of the other corporation.
(4)  If a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state,
whether under its corporate name or an assumed corporate name, changes its
corporate name to one that does not satisfy the requirements of Subsections
(1) through (3), or the requirements of Section 16-10a-401, it may not
transact business in this state under the changed name but shall use an
assumed corporate name that does meet the requirements of this section and
shall deliver to the division for filing an amended application for authority
to transact business pursuant to Section 16-10a-1504.
